test/src/morphology/V-rodiekseh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - rodiekseh: # Verb 'syntyä, ilmaantua' - full paradigm
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg1: roimmos
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg2: roittos
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg3: roih
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl1: roimmokseh
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl2: roittokseh
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl3: roijah
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg+ConNeg: roi
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl1+ConNeg: roi
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl2+ConNeg: roi
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl3+ConNeg: roija

     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg1: rodimmos
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg2: rodittos
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg3: rodih
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl1: rodimmokseh
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl2: rodittokseh
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl3: rodittih
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg+ConNeg: rodinuh
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl1+ConNeg: rodinuh
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl2+ConNeg: rodinuh
     rodiekseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl3+ConNeg: rodittu
